Tennessee, session 114, HB0837.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 55-4-226(c)(4), is amended by
deleting the language "sixty (60) days" wherever it appears and substituting instead the
language "ninety (90) days".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it, and
applies to temporary plates issued on or after that date.
HB0837
002693
- 1 -